California, session 20252026, AB1880.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5.2 (commencing with Section 13100) is added to Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 5.2. Pink Alert13100. (a) The State Department of Social Services, in collaboration with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall create a Pink Alert. If a person is reported to be pregnant and needs emergency prenatal services or housing, then the individual assisting may text a specified number to alert all necessary emergency services the location of the pregnant person.(1) The individual sending the text can respond with “housing” if the pregnant person only seeks housing. (2) The individual sending the text can respond with “prenatal” if the pregnant person only seeks emergency prenatal services.(b) Radio, television, and cable and satellite systems are encouraged to, but not required to, cooperate with disseminating the information contained in a Pink Alert. (c) Upon activation of a Pink Alert, local emergency services are encouraged to assist the pregnant person by taking them to the nearest hospital or shelter. (d) The Pink Alert shall be able to do the following:(1) Notify all emergency services, doulas, and obstetrics and gynecology doctors and nurses for prenatal care.(2) Notify all nonprofit housing shelters, temporary housing, or overnight shelters that are capable of housing pregnant persons.(e) For purposes of this chapter, “Pink Alert” means a registration-based notification system designed to issue and coordinate alerts with respect to a person who is pregnant and seeks shelter or emergency prenatal services. Only organizations that are a part of emergency services will be automatically enrolled into the program. SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation creating a PINK Alert to notify all law enforcement, emergency services, homeless shelters, and nonprofits that there is a pregnant person in need of shelter or prenatal services.